District of Columbia statutes.
1-819.07

Severability of provisions.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of such provision to any person or circumstances, shall be held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 730, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11097
renumbered as § 11087, Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3966, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(1), (2)
2001 Ed., § 1-817.07.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.7.